Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.250

Applications for noxious weed control funds.

The legislative authority of any county with an activated noxious weed control board or the board of any weed district may apply to the director for noxious weed control funds when informed by the director that funds are available. Any applicant must employ adequate administrative personnel to supervise an effective weed control program as determined by the director with advice from the state noxious weed control board. The director with advice from the state noxious weed control board shall adopt rules on the distribution and use of noxious weed control account funds.

[ 1997 c 353 s 28; 1987 c 438 s 32; 1975 1st ex.s. c 13 s 11; 1969 ex.s. c 113 s 25.]